src/morphology/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The VOTIC language adverbs ...

LEXICON ADV_
+Adv: K ;

LEXICON ADV-QNT_
+Adv+Qnt: K ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT_
+Adv+Spat: K ;

LEXICON ADV-STATE_
+Adv+State: K ;

LEXICON ADV-TEMP_
+Adv+Temp: K ;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
