src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
!! ----------
!! Adverbs in the VOTIC language describe things.

LEXICON adverbs
!adjective  Comparisons   ;
rohkaap	   ADV-QNT_ "/(est) rohkem/(fin) enemmän/(rus) больше" ;
õhtagon	   ADV-TEMP_ "/(est) õhtul/(fin) illalla/(rus) вечером" ;
oomõn      ADV-TEMP_ "/(est) homme/(fin) huomenna/(rus) завтра" ;
vähäizee   ADV-QNT_ "/(est) veidi/(fin) vähän/(rus) немножко" ;
aikaa      ADV-TEMP_ "/(est) ammu/(fin) ajat sitten/(rus) давно" ;
akkunalla  ADV-SPAT_ "/(est) õues/(fin) pihalla|ulkona/(rus) во" ;
alassi	   ADV-STATE_ "/(est) alasti/(fin) alasti/(rus) нагишом" ;
raazin% ruuzin:raazin% ruuzin ADV_ "/(est) pilla palla/(fin) sikin sokin/(rus) в беспоряде" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
